Wyoming, session 2025, HB0058.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 36-6-101 by creating a new subsection
(q) is amended to read:

36-6-101. Terms of leases; extensions; lessees
specified; rules and regulations; rent and royalties;
assignment of leases; grazing and agricultural leases;
HB0058

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0175
cooperation with United States or its lessees, in
cooperative or unit plans; notice.

(q) Not later than sixty (60) days before approving
the issuance or extension of a mineral lease for oil, gas,
coal or other mineral production on state lands or state
school lands under this article, the board of land
commissioners shall provide notice of the proposed mineral
lease in writing to the board of county commissioners of
the county or counties where the state lands or state
school lands are to be leased. The board of land
commissioners shall provide the board of county
commissioners an opportunity to submit or provide public
comment on the proposed lease in writing or at the meeting
where the lease is to be discussed or approved.

Section 2.

(a) This act applies to all leases and lease
extensions for oil, gas, coal or other mineral production
for state lands and state school lands proposed, issued and
entered into on and after the effective date of this act.

HB0058

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0175
(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter
or impair any lease entered into before the effective date
of this act.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0058